South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4713.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-3-29 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-3-29. A person who, with intent to kill, attempts to kill another person with malice aforethought, either expressed or implied, commits the offense of attempted murder. A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of five years and not more than thirty years. A sentence imposed pursuant to this section may not be suspended nor may probation be granted. SECTION 2.  The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide.  After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----